Hawaii, session 2025, SB1194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the preservation of public safety and efficient flow of traffic are essential priorities in maintaining the well-being of the State's communities.  It is recognized that roadways and intersections serve as critical junctions for mobility and connectivity.  As streets are shared spaces, their proper use is fundamental to ensuring the safety of drivers, pedestrians, and all users of public thoroughfares.  Distracted driving has been identified as a leading cause of accidents and injuries, posing a significant risk to life and property, and creating disruptions that affect everyone in the State. The legislature further finds that addressing behaviors that contribute to roadway hazards, by clearly defining and curbing distractions at these critical points is critical to public safety.  The legislature concludes that there is a need to enhance road safety, reduce traffic incidents, and promote a culture of attentiveness and responsibility on the State's roadways. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit any person from engaging in any activity that has the intent and effect of distracting drivers along streets, roadways, or other public property within one hundred feet of an intersection. SECTION 2.  Section 291C-77, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§291C-77  Pedestrians soliciting rides, business, or attention of motorist. (a)  Except as otherwise provided by county ordinance, no person shall stand in, walk along, or otherwise occupy a portion of a highway for the purpose of soliciting a ride, employment, business, or contributions from the occupant of any vehicle. (b)  No person shall stand on or in proximity to a street or highway for the purpose of soliciting the watching or guarding of any vehicle while parked or about to be parked on a street or highway. (c) No person shall engage in commercial activity, advertising, soliciting, or any other activity that has the effect of distracting or drawing the attention of drivers along any street, roadway, or other public place within one hundred feet of an intersection with the intent or purpose of engaging with drivers." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________